Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. Powers and Miscellaneous Matters
§ 15-1-116.
Ordinances; publication required; exception; attestation; recodification or revision.

Every ordinance before becoming effective shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which maintains a physical office at which advertisements are accepted and which is open to the public during regularly set business hours within the boundaries of the city or town. The newspaper shall publish the ordinance within nine (9) days from the date of receipt. If there is no such newspaper, the ordinance shall be posted for at least ten (10) days in the city clerk’s office and in such other places as the governing body determines. Emergency ordinances are effective upon proclamation of the mayor, and as soon thereafter as is practicable they shall be published and posted in the manner required of other ordinances.

Every ordinance, within a reasonable time after passage, shall be signed by the mayor, attested by the clerk and recorded in a book kept for that purpose. The attestation of the clerk shall show that the ordinance was duly published and posted.

A recodification or revision of ordinances shall be published by title only together with a brief summary of the recodification or revision, in the manner provided in subsection (a) of this section for newspaper publication, provided that a copy of the recodification or revision shall be available to the public at all reasonable hours in the office of the city or town clerk.

Ordinances adopted by the governing bodies of all incorporated cities and towns prior to the effective date of this act, which were posted for at least ten (10) days in the city clerk’s office and in such other places as the governing body determined, are deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this section.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-16; Laws 1969, ch. 159, § 2; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 1; 2005, ch. 131, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

in (a), inserted “which maintains a physical office at which advertisements are accepted and which is open to the public during regularly set business hours”, and substituted “boundaries of the city or town” for “city or town”; added (d).

Laws 2005, ch. 131, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 15-1-101(a)(xv).

Stated

in

Uhls v. State ex rel. City of Cheyenne, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. City of Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967).

§ 15-1-117.
Ordinances; amendment and repeal.

Amendments and repeals of ordinances, or sections thereof, shall be by ordinance. An amending ordinance shall set forth the entire ordinance or section as amended. No vote of the governing body may be reconsidered or rescinded at any meeting unless there are as many members present as there were when the vote was originally taken.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-17; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-118.
Effect of governmental change on ordinances.

If any city or town acquires a new classification or changes its form of government, all ordinances, bylaws and resolutions shall continue in force until amended or repealed, except insofar as they may be inconsistent with the provisions of the law governing the new class or form of government.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-18; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-119.
Adoption of state traffic laws and other provisions by reference authorized; procedure; effect.

Any city or town may adopt by reference all or part of The Uniform Act Regulating Traffic on Highways (W.S.

31-5-101

through

31-5-1214

) and any national fire prevention, building, plumbing and electrical codes, and the Wyoming public works standard specifications published by the Wyoming public works council.

If any acts, codes or standard specifications are adopted by reference, the ordinance shall state whether all of an act, code or standard specifications is adopted or describe the parts or sections adopted by specific reference to sections.

It is not necessary for the city or town to publish the act, code or standard specifications adopted by reference, but the ordinance shall state that a copy of the act, code or standard specifications is on file in the office of the clerk of the city or town. The clerk shall keep on file in his office a copy thereof for examination.

If any act, code or standard specifications, or part thereof, is adopted by reference, it constitutes an adoption of the act, code or standard specifications as then enacted. Any subsequent additions or amendments to the code adopted by reference are not effective until adopted by ordinance.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-20; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-120

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, § 1; 1997, ch. 104, § 1.

Cited

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980); Ruhs v. Pacific Power & Light, 671 F.2d 1268,

1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 21320

(10th Cir. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of hotel or motel operator for injury or death of guest or privy resulting from condition in plumbing or bathroom of room, 93 ALR3d 253.

Liability, in motor vehicle-related cases, of governmental entity for injury or death resulting from design, construction, or failure to warn of narrow bridge, 2 ALR4th 635.

§ 15-1-120.
Effect of governmental change on territorial limits.

If any city or town changes its form of government, the territorial limits and all rights, powers and property under the former organization shall remain the same under the new organization. No existing right or liability, or suit or prosecution may be affected by a change in the form of government unless otherwise provided by law.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 53; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-53; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-401

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to procedure for change of government, see §

15-11-301

.

§ 15-1-121.
Fire protection agreements authorized; limitation; liability.

Every city, town and county may enter into negotiations with each other or with the board of directors of a fire district for the purpose of:

Establishing a mutual aid agreement for fire protection; or

Executing a contract in which the city, town or county agrees unilaterally to provide fire protection for another city, town or fire district upon conditions and for consideration as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties.

At no time under any agreement or contract executed pursuant to this section shall any city, town, county or fire district entirely deplete its fire defenses in providing assistance unless specifically authorized to do so by its governing body.

No city or town is liable for damages to persons or property resulting from the operation or presence of fire fighting equipment outside the corporate limits pursuant to an agreement or contract under this section.

Entry into an agreement or contract pursuant to this section does not create a new or reorganized taxing entity as provided in W.S. 39-13-104(m).

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 127, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 34, § 2; 2007, ch. 29, § 1; 2008, ch. 56, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) deleted “contiguous” preceding “fire district.”

The 2008 amendment,

added (d).

Laws 2008, ch. 56 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, ch. 56, § 2 provides: “This act shall apply to all ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on any property on and after January 1, 2008.”

§ 15-1-122.
Special charters repealed; rights preserved.

All special charters in effect on July 1, 1965 are repealed. However, any property right or vested interest that may have accrued by virtue of its charter is preserved to the city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 490; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-490; W.S. 1977, §

15-9-101

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-123.
Prospective operation; existing transactions saved.

This act applies to transactions entered into and events occurring after July 1, 1965, but may not be construed to affect any substantive or vested right.

Transactions validly entered into before July 1, 1965, and the rights, duties and interests flowing therefrom remain valid thereafter and may be terminated, consummated or enforced as required or permitted by any statute or other law repealed by this act as though the repeal had not occurred, or at the option of the governing body, under this act as if commenced hereunder.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 492; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-492; W.S. 1977, § 15-9-102(a), (b); Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a) and twice in subsection (b), see § 15-1-101(a)(xv).

§ 15-1-124.
Employee bonds.

The governing body of any city or town shall require the treasurer and may require any other official or employee to post bonds for the performance of their duties. The bonds shall be from a surety company licensed to do business in this state, in an amount as the governing body determines, payable to the city or town, and shall be filed with the city or town clerk. The city or town shall pay the bond costs and any filing costs.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 1.

§ 15-1-125.
Presentation and payment of claims; when warrant draws interest; exception.

All claims and demands against any city or town shall be presented to the governing body by itemized invoice or other document from the vendor with a full account of the quantity and total cost for each item or for the services rendered. No payment shall be approved by the governing body unless the claim is certified under penalty of perjury by the vendor or by an authorized person employed by the city or town receiving the items or for whom the services were rendered. No claim or demand may be audited or allowed unless presented and certified as provided in this section, and no suit may be instituted against a city or town for any claim unless it has been first presented to the governing body and a reasonable time given to act upon the claim.

Upon the allowance of any claim or demand by the governing body, the treasurer shall issue a check or warrant for the correct amount. The check or warrant shall be signed by the mayor and countersigned by the treasurer or any other person the governing body designates to countersign checks or warrants in the treasurer’s absence. If there is not sufficient money in the treasury to pay the warrant, the treasurer shall endorse on the warrant the date and a statement that it has been presented for payment but has not been paid for want of funds. Thereafter, the warrant shall draw interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per year.

This section does not apply to claims under W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-119

[§

1-39-120

].

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 158; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-155, 15.1-158; W.S. 1977, §§

15-2-202

, 15-2-205; Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 2; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 152, § 3.

Compliance with provisions necessary. —

Statutes of this kind must be complied with before bringing an action, regardless of whether statute in specific terms prohibits bringing an action without compliance therewith. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Presentation to town of verified claim is necessary

before commencement of action thereon against the town. Town Council of Hudson v. Ladd, 37 Wyo. 419, 263 P. 703,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1928).

And failure to do so constitutes waiver. —

Plaintiff's failure to present claim to town board, where not raised by demurrer (now motion to dismiss) or answer, was waived in an action against the town for damages resulting from changing channel of river. Town Council of Hudson v. Ladd, 37 Wyo. 419, 263 P. 703,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1928).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Estoppel as to claim against municipality, 1 ALR2d 338.

Compromise of claim, power of city as to, 15 ALR2d 1359.

Interest on claim against a governmental unit in absence of provision in contract or express statutory provision, 24 ALR2d 928.

§ 15-1-126.
Collecting city or town monies; settlement date.

Every officer and employee collecting or receiving monies belonging to the city or town shall settle with the treasurer on or before the last day of each month, or as directed by the governing body, and immediately pay all money into the treasury for the benefit of the funds to which the monies belong. If the last day of the month falls on Sunday, or a legal holiday, the payment shall be made on the next preceding business day.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 251; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-231, 15.1-251; W.S. 1977, §§

15-4-225

, 15-4-254; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 152, § 3.

Transmitting money to agent without security for payment ofbonds. —

The failure of the council in its contract with fiscal agent to demand security relieved city treasurer from duty of making such demand, thus he was justified in transmitting funds to such agent to pay bonds and coupons and was not liable for any loss sustained by the failure of such agent to do so. City of Casper v. Joyce, 54 Wyo. 198, 88 P.2d 467,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1939).

§ 15-1-127.
Prohibitions; interest in contracts; exception; extra pay; compensation to nonofficers; exception.

No qualified member of the governing body of any city or town or any member of that qualified member’s immediate family may receive any monetary or other economic benefit from any contract to which the city or town or anyone for its benefit is a party. The obligation on the part of the city or town is void in any contract in which a monetary or other economic benefit will be received by a qualified member of the governing body or his family who does not comply with subsection (b) of this section. Any money paid on the contract may be recovered by the city or town from any persons by an action brought in the name of the city or town.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to any qualified member of a governing body or any member of that qualified member’s immediate family who may receive any monetary or other economic benefit from any contract made by the governing body if the qualified member complies with the following:

The qualified member:

Shall not participate in the consideration or discussion relating to the contract;

Shall not attempt to influence the other members of the governing body in any way relating to the contract;

Shall reveal the nature and extent of any monetary or other economic benefit he or any member of his immediate family may receive to the other members of the governing body prior to consideration of the contract;

Shall not vote on the matter of granting the contract;

Shall absent himself during the consideration, discussion and vote on the contract; and

Shall not act, directly or indirectly, for the governing body in inspection, operation, administration or securing performance under the contract in which he or any member of his immediate family may receive any monetary or other economic benefit.

The governing body, by ordinance, shall prescribe requirements governing conflicts of interest by any employee and any member of his immediate family and procedures by which any employee and any member of his immediate family may be exempt from those requirements.

No qualified member of the governing body, officer or employee may receive any pay or perquisites from the city other than his salary for any work coming within the scope of his duties as provided by ordinance and the law. The governing body shall not pay or appropriate any money or other valuable thing to any person not a qualified member of the governing body, officer or employee for the performance of any act, service or duty which is within the proper scope of the duties of any qualified member of the governing body, officer or employee of the city or town, unless specially appropriated and ordered by a vote of three-fourths (3/4) of all members elected to the governing body.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 176; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-176; Laws 1969, ch. 151, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

15-3-206

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 2.

Town attorney. —

Town attorney's action in petitioning for annexation and applying for liquor license was not a conflict of interest in violation of this section. Kroenlein v. Eddington, 2001 WY 115, 35 P.3d 1207,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 15-1-128.
Officers and employees; prohibitions; gratuities; exceptions; violations; results therefrom.

No officer or employee of any city or town shall:

Solicit or receive any pay, commission, money or thing of value, or derive any benefit, profit or advantage, directly or indirectly, from or by reason of any improvement, alteration or repair required by authority of the city or town, or any contract to which it is a party, except his lawful compensation as an officer or employee and except as otherwise provided in W.S. 15-1-127(b) and (c);

Solicit, accept or receive, directly or indirectly, from any public service corporation, or the owner of any public utility or franchise of the city, any pass, frank, free ticket, free service or any other favor upon terms more favorable than those granted the public generally, except that councilmen who are regularly employed by any public service corporation or owner of a public utility or franchise may receive free service or favor as is given to all other similar employees.

Any officer or employee who violates this section shall be subject to removal from his position or other disciplinary action after hearing.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 235; W.S. 1957, §§ 15-298, 15.1-235; W.S. 1977, §§

15-4-209

,

15-4-229

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 2.

§ 15-1-129.
Contracts to house prisoners.

The governing body of any city or town may contract with the sheriff of any county in Wyoming to house prisoners charged or sentenced for municipal ordinance violations in the county jail.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 122, § 1.

§ 15-1-130.
Prohibitions; amateur radio antenna regulation.

No city or town shall enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation that fails to conform to the limited preemption entitled “Amateur Radio Preemption, 101 FCC 2d 952 (1985)” issued by the federal communications commission. Ordinances or regulations may be adopted by a city or town with respect to amateur radio antennas which shall conform to the limited federal preemption entitled “Amateur Radio Preemption, 101 FCC 2d 952 (1985)” which states local regulations that involve placement, screening or height of antennas based on health, safety or aesthetic considerations shall be crafted to reasonably accommodate amateur communications. No ordinance or regulation adopted by a city or town under this section shall establish a maximum height for an amateur radio antenna of less than seventy (70) feet above ground.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 76, § 1; 1998, ch. 34, § 1.

§ 15-1-131.
Communications companies franchise agreements authorized; limitations; procedure; exceptions.

The governing body of a city or town may enter into a franchise agreement with a communications company, as defined by W.S. 1-26-813(b), for access to its public rights-of-way if the governing body deems the franchise agreement to be proper and the agreement meets the requirements of this section.

All franchise agreements entered into by a governing body with a communications company under this section or with a cable company pursuant to 47 U.S.C. § 541 et seq. shall:

Be fair and reasonable;

Be competitively neutral and nondiscriminatory;

Comply with all requirements of applicable federal and state laws and ordinance;

Not unreasonably impair or inhibit the deployment of communications services;

To the extent practical encourage the deployment of communications services to serve consumers.

Franchise fees assessed under a franchise agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall:

Be passed through to customers unless otherwise agreed;

Not be assessed on revenues from internet access service.

A communications company assessed a franchise fee on local exchange services by a governing body may not be assessed any additional franchise fees by that governing body, including an assessment on any other communications services.

A communications company proposing to enter into a franchise agreement shall provide to the governing body of the city or town a request for negotiations. Negotiations between the governing body and a proposed franchisee shall not exceed one hundred eighty (180) days unless agreed to by the parties in writing. A request made under this subsection shall include, at a minimum, the date of the request for negotiations, the proposed date for the start of negotiations, the date by which negotiations shall terminate and the contact information for the proposed franchisee.

Any holder of a cable franchise pursuant to 47 U.S.C. § 541 et seq. shall be exempt from subsections (a), (c) and (e) of this section. Subject to federal law and the provisions of this subsection, a governing body may assess a franchise fee on gross revenues as determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles for the provision of cable service over a cable system operated by a holder of a cable franchise pursuant to 47 U.S.C. § 541 et seq. As used in this subsection, “gross revenues” shall not include any taxes, fees or assessments collected by a holder of a cable franchise from subscribers that are passed through to a government agency, including the user fee assessed by the federal communications commission, franchise fees, sales taxes and utility taxes. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit or alter any decision by a governing body to not impose the franchise fee authorized by this section or any decision by a governing body to enter into an agreement with a holder of a cable franchise to impose a franchise fee on only a portion of the gross revenues from the provision of cable service subject to franchise fees under federal law and the provisions of this subsection.

History.

2020 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 85, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 15-1-132.
City and town prohibitions on utility connections.

No city or town shall enact or implement any ordinance or policy that prohibits, or has the effect of prohibiting, the connection or reconnection of an electric, natural gas, propane or other energy utility service provided by a public utility, municipality or cooperative utility.

History.

2021 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 153, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.